Wisconsin, session 2025, SB824.
do enact as follows:SB824,11Section 1. 85.66 of the statutes is created to read:SB824,2,6285.66 Required inclusions in long-range statewide transportation 3plans. Each long-range statewide transportation plan developed by the 4department beginning on the effective date of this section .... [LRB inserts date], 5and required under 23 USC 135 shall include a vision, or provide reference to 6another planning document that includes a vision, for all of the following:SB824,2,77(1) Low-carbon public transit.SB824,2,88(2) Electrification of the transportation sector.SB824,2,99(3) Cost-effective charging infrastructure.SB824,2,1110(4) Incentives to develop equitable, clean transportation options throughout 11the state.SB824,2,1412(5) Transportation solutions for underserved areas of the state, including 13rural communities, low-income communities, and communities where the majority 14of residents are members of a racial minority.SB824,215Section 2. Nonstatutory provisions.SB824,3,616(1) The department of transportation shall prepare a report detailing efforts 17the department has completed to incorporate a vision for the items required under 18s. 85.66 into the department’s long-range statewide transportation plan or related 19planning documents. The department’s report shall also identify items requiring a 20vision that have not yet been incorporated into the existing long-range 1transportation plan or related planning documents and shall include strategies the 2department plans to use to incorporate the items into a future long-range 3transportation plan or related planning document. No later than 6 months after 4the effective date of this subsection, the department of transportation shall submit 5its report to the governor and to the relevant standing committees of the 6legislature.SB824,3,77